Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1838.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6122 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 6122. Authority to erect traffic-control devices.* * *(e) Payment of costs to install and maintain traffic-control signals.--The department shall pay for the costs associated with the installation and maintenance of traffic-control signals on State-designated highways. If a State-designated highway intersects with a highway under the jurisdiction of a local authority, the department shall pay for the cost of installing and maintaining a traffic-control signal at the intersection in proportion to the number of State-designated highways at the intersection and the local authority shall pay for the balance 12345678910111213141516171819 of the cost.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1838PN2274 - 2 - 12